Utah statutes.
41-22-18.   Ordinances or local laws relating to operation and equipment of vehicles.

The provisions of this chapter and other applicable laws of this state govern the operation, equipment, registration, and all other matters relating to the use of off-highway vehicles on public land.  Nothing in this chapter may be construed to prevent the adoption of any ordinance or local law relating to the operation and equipment of off-highway vehicles in which the provisions are identical to the provisions of this chapter or the rules promulgated under this chapter, but these ordinances or local laws shall be operative only as long as and to the extent that they continue to be identical to the provisions of this chapter or the rules promulgated under this chapter.



Amended by Chapter 1, 1986 Special Session 2

